Virginia statutes. Title 25.1. Eminent Domain.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 2, 8, 9, 15, 27, 63; 17 M.J. Streets and Highways, § 5.

§ 25.1-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Appraisal”
means a written statement independently and impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an opinion of defined value of an adequately described property as of a specific date, supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant market information.

“Body determining just compensation”
means a panel of commissioners empaneled pursuant to §

25.1-227.2

, jury selected pursuant to §

25.1-229

, or the court if neither a panel of commissioners nor a jury is appointed or empaneled.

“Court”
means the court having jurisdiction as provided in §

25.1-201

.

“Date of valuation”
means the time of the lawful taking by the petitioner, or the date of the filing of the petition pursuant to §

25.1-205

, whichever occurs first.

“Freeholder”
means any person owning an interest in land in fee, including a person owning a condominium unit.

“Land”
means real estate and all rights and appurtenances thereto, together with the structures and other improvements thereon, and any right, title, interest, estate or claim in or to real estate.

“Locality” or “local government”
means a county, city, or town, as the context may require.

“Lost access”
means a change of vehicular or pedestrian access to property that is caused by a public use project for which the eminent domain power has been exercised against the property and which results in a diminution in the value of the property.

“Lost profits”
means a loss of profits or expected profits suffered by a business or farm operation as a result of a taking or damaging of the property on which the business or farm operation is operated for a period not to exceed three years from the later of (i) the date of valuation or (ii) the date the state agency or its contractor prevents the owner from using the land or any of the owner’s other property rights are taken. The business or farm operation claiming lost profits is entitled to compensation whether part of the property or the entire parcel of property is taken or damaged, and bears the burden of proving lost profits in accordance with the requirements of subsection C of §

25.1-230.1

.

“Owner”
means any person who owns property, provided that the person’s ownership of the property is of record in the land records of the clerk’s office of the circuit court of the county or city where the property is located. The term “owner” shall not include trustees or beneficiaries under a deed of trust, any person with a security interest in the property, or any person with a judgment or lien against the property. This definition of the term “owner” shall not affect in any way the valuation of property.

“Person”
means any individual; firm; cooperative; association; corporation; limited liability company; trust; business trust; syndicate; partnership; limited liability partnership; joint venture; receiver; trustee in bankruptcy or any other person acting in a fiduciary or representative capacity, whether appointed by a court or otherwise; club, society or other group or combination acting as a unit; the Commonwealth or any department, agency or instrumentality thereof; any city, county, town, or other political subdivision or any department, agency or instrumentality thereof; or any interstate body to which the Commonwealth is a party.

“Petitioner” or “condemnor”
means any person who possesses the power to exercise the right of eminent domain and who seeks to exercise such power. The term “petitioner” or “condemnor” includes a state agency.

“Property”
means land and personal property, and any right, title, interest, estate or claim in or to such property.

“State agency”
means any (i) department, agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth; (ii) public authority, municipal corporation, local governmental unit or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency or instrumentality thereof; (iii) person who has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law; or (iv) two or more of the aforementioned that carry out projects that cause persons to be displaced.

“State institution”
means any (i) institution enumerated in §

23.1-1100

or (ii) state hospital or state training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

History.

1962, c. 426, § 25-46.3; 1991, c. 520; 2000, c. 1029; 2002, c. 878; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 586; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2010, c. 835; 2011, cc. 117, 190; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 699, 719; 2015, c. 642; 2017, c. 314; 2018, c. 702; 2022, cc. 734, 735.

Transition provisions.

In June 2002, the Virginia Code Commission undertook the revision of Title 25, establishing procedures for exercising the power of eminent domain. Title 25 had not been revised since the adoption of the Code of Virginia in 1950. During the past 52 years, many changes have been made to the procedures applicable to the condemnation of property. The primary purpose of the Title 25 revision was to reorganize the laws in a logical manner and improve their structure and clarity, while seeking to remove or update archaic references and conform the provisions to current statutory drafting protocols, incorporating current practices, resolving confusion caused by conflicting provisions and conforming certain provisions to other statutes. The revision, as amended and adopted by the General Assembly, became Acts 2003, c. 940, effective July 1, 2003.

Title 25 was rewritten primarily as new Title 25.1, with certain sections relocated elsewhere.
In addition, provisions in titles other than Title 25 that authorize entities to acquire property by condemnation were also amended.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections of Title 25 have been added to corresponding new sections.

The case notes appearing under new sections were decided under corresponding former sections or prior law.

For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 2, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section or chapter of Title 25 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to July 1, 2003, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 25.1 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 25.1 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 25 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.”

Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 3, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 25 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 4, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the codification of Title 25.1 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2003 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 5, provides: “That the repeal of Title 25 shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit or action pending on that day.”

Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 6, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before July 1, 2003, shall be valid although given, taken or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 25.1 had been effective before the same was given, taken or issued.”

Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 7, provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision or section of Title 25.1 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 25.1 are declared severable.”

Acts
2022, c. 734, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed prior to July 1, 2022, (i) a petition in condemnation pursuant to Chapter 2 ( §

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia or (ii) a certificate of take or deposit pursuant to Chapter 3 ( §

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1 or Title 33.2 of the Code of Virginia. Any condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed a petition or certificate described in clause (i) or (ii) shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to July 1, 2022.”

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 835, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to actions filed on or after July 1, 2010.”

Acts 2011, cc. 117 and 190, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to the acquisition of real property by a railroad, public service corporation, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or two or more of the aforementioned, that is (i) the subject of a certificate recorded prior to July 1, 2011, in the clerk’s office where deeds are recorded; (ii) the subject of a petition for condemnation filed prior to July 1, 2011; or (iii) required to construct a project funded by bonds approved for issuance by a locality prior to July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2012, cc. 699 and 719, which added the definitions of “Lost access” and “Lost profits,” in cl. 2 provide: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 2013, contingent upon the passage of an amendment to the Constitution of Virginia on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2012 amending Section 11 of Article I of the Constitution of Virginia.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-1100” was substituted for “23-14” in the definition of “State institution” to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 586, in the definition of “Body determining just compensation,” deleted “panel of commissioners empanelled pursuant to § 25.1-227” preceding “jury selected” and substituted “a jury is not empanelled” for “neither a panel of commissioners nor a jury is appointed or empanelled.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and rewrote the definition of “State institution.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 835, applicable only to actions filed on or after July 1, 2010, in the first definition, inserted “panel of commissioners empanelled pursuant to §

25.1-227.2

” and substituted “if neither a panel of commissioners nor a jury is appointed or empanelled” for “if a jury is not empanelled.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 117 and 190 are identical, and added the definitions for “Appraisal” and “State agency,” and in the definition for “Petitioner or condemnor,” deleted “under this chapter” from the end of the first sentence, and substituted “includes a state agency” for “includes any person required to make an effort to purchase property as provided in §

25.1-204

” in the last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and deleted “for individuals with mental retardation” following “state training center” in the paragraph defining “State institution.”

The 2012 amendments by cc. 699 and 719, contingently effective January 1, 2013, are identical, and added the definitions of “Lost access” and “Lost profits.” See Editor’s note for contingent effective date.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 642, in the first sentence in the definition for “Lost profits,” inserted “as defined in §

25.1-230.1

,” inserted the “(i)” designator preceding “three years,” inserted “if less than the entire parcel . . . property is taken,” and substituted the “(a)” and “(b)” designators for the “(i)” and “(ii)” designators; and in the second sentence, deleted “as an element of damage” preceding “in a claim for compensation.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, deleted “educational” preceding “institution” in clause (i) of the definition for “State institution.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 702, in the definition for “Lost profits,” rewrote and divided the first sentence into the first three sentences, which formerly read “‘Lost profits’ means a loss of business profits, as defined in §

25.1-230.1

, subject to adjustment using generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, from a business or farm operation for a period not to exceed (i) three years from the date of valuation if less than the entire parcel of property is taken or (ii) one year from the date of valuation if the entire parcel of property is taken that is suffered as a result of a taking of the property on which the business or farm operation is located, provided (a) the business is owned by the owner of the property taken, or by a tenant whose leasehold interest grants the tenant exclusive possession of substantially all the property taken, or (b) the farm operation is operated by the owner of the property taken, or by a tenant using for a farm operation the property taken, to the extent that the loss is determined and proven pursuant to subsection C of §

25.1-230.1

.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 734, deleted the “Business profit” definition in subsection A, which read: “‘Business profit’ means the average net income for federal income tax purposes for the three years immediately prior to the later of (i) the date of valuation or (ii) the date the state agency or its contractor prevents the owner from using the land or any of the owner’s other property rights are taken, for a business or farm operation located on the property taken.”; in subsection C, substituted “taken or damaged if the owner or the business or farm operation proves with reasonable certainty” for “taken only if the owner proves with reasonable certainty”, and inserted “or damaging” following “taking”; in subsection F, inserted “of the business or farm operation” following “owner” in the third sentence, and in the fourth sentence, inserted “upon motion of the owner of the business or farm operation” and deleted “if the lost profits claim period will not expire until one year or later from the date of the filing of the petition for condemnation”; in subsection G, inserted “for lost profits or lost access” and substituted “where the impact to the property is for a period of fewer than seven days” for “other than that which is directly and proximately caused by a taking or damaging of property through the exercise of eminent domain”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, rewrote the “Lost profits” definition, which read: “‘Lost profits’ means a loss of business profits, as defined in §

25.1-230.1

, that is suffered as a result of a taking of the property on which a business or farm operation is located, subject to adjustment using generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, from a business or farm operation period not to exceed three years from the later of (i) the date of valuation or (ii) the date the state agency or its contractor prevents the owner from using the land or any of the owner's other property rights are taken. The person claiming lost profits is entitled to compensation whether part of the property or the entire parcel of property is taken. In order to qualify for an award of lost profits, one of the following conditions shall be met: (a) the business is owned by the owner of the property taken, or by a tenant whose leasehold interest grants the tenant exclusive possession of substantially all the property taken, or (b) the farm operation is operated by the owner of the property taken, or by a tenant using for a farm operation the property taken, to the extent that the loss is determined and proven pursuant to subsection C of §

25.1-230.1

. This definition of the term ‘lost profits’ shall not create any new right or remedy or diminish any existing right or remedy other than to allow the body determining just compensation to consider lost profits in awarding just compensation if a person asserts a right to lost profits in a claim for compensation.”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

For annual survey article, “Real Estate Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2006).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-401 Petition for Condemnation of Permanent and Temporary Rights of Entry, et seq.

§ 25.1-101.
Condemnation by state institutions.

Any state institution may acquire by condemnation title to (i) land, (ii) any easement thereover or (iii) any sand, earth, gravel, water or other necessary material for the purpose of opening, constructing, repairing or maintaining a road or for any other authorized public undertaking; however, such acquisition by condemnation shall only be commenced if the terms of purchase cannot be agreed upon or the owner (a) is unknown, (b) cannot with reasonable diligence be found within this Commonwealth or (c) cannot negotiate an agreement or convey legal title to the property because the owner is a person under a disability.

Condemnation proceedings authorized by subsection A shall be conducted under the provisions of Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of this title insofar as applicable.

History.

Code 1950, § 25-232; 1964, c. 291, § 25-232.01; 1980, c. 559; 1986, c. 117; 2003, c. 940.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 Miscellaneous Proceedings. § 16.03 Eminent Domain Condemnations. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, § 57; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 8, 9; 17 M.J. Streets and Highways, § 23.'

§ 25.1-102.
Condemnation of property of corporations possessing power of eminent domain.

Except as provided in §§

15.2-1906

and

15.2-2146

, no (i) corporation or (ii) electric authority created under the provisions of Chapter 54 (§

15.2-5400

et seq.) of Title 15.2 shall file a petition to take by condemnation proceedings any property belonging to any other corporation possessing the power of eminent domain, unless, after notice to all parties in interest and an opportunity for a hearing, the State Corporation Commission shall certify that a public necessity or that an essential public convenience shall so require, and shall give its permission thereto; and in no event shall one corporation take by condemnation proceedings any property owned by and essential to the purposes of another corporation possessing the power of eminent domain. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, a locality exercising the powers granted by §

15.2-2109

or §

15.2-2115

shall be subject to the provisions of this section to the same extent as are corporations, unless otherwise provided in §

15.2-1906

or §

15.2-2146

.

If the State Corporation Commission gives its permission to a condemnation, the Commission shall establish for use in any condemnation proceeding whether any payment for stranded investment is appropriate and, if so, the amount of such payment and any conditions thereof.

Any condemnor that is authorized to use the procedure set out in Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) of this title by a provision that incorporates such procedure by reference shall, in using such procedure, be subject to the provisions of this section to the same extent as are corporations, unless the provision specifically provides that this section shall not apply to such condemnor’s use of such procedure.

History.

Code 1919, § 3832; 1996, c. 619, § 25-233; 1999, cc. 484, 531; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to acquisition of property and exercise of right of eminent domain for municipal or county airports, see § 5.1-34.

As to proceedings when one public service corporation desires to cross works of another, see § 56-17 et seq.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 217; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 13, 14, 27; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 30; 17 M.J. Streets and Highways, § 25.

§ 25.1-103.
Condemnation of lands of state institutions.

Without the consent of the General Assembly, no condemnor shall be authorized to condemn or acquire any lands belonging to, attached to the site, or used for the purposes of any state institution.

History.

Code 1919, § 4384; Code 1950, §§ 25-45, 25-46; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.6; 2003, c. 940.

§ 25.1-104.
Condemnation of lands of private educational institutions for highway purposes.

No lands of any private, nonprofit institution of higher education in the Commonwealth approved to confer degrees pursuant to Article 3 (§

23.1-213

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 23.1 that, at the time proceedings are instituted, (i) are located within 500 feet of any building erected and used for school purposes or (ii) surround the school buildings and are used as a campus, park, or athletic ground or field, shall be subject to condemnation for the purposes of public highways.

History.

Code 1919, § 4384; Code 1950, §§ 25-45, 25-46; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.6; 2003, c. 940.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 3 (§

23.1-213

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 23.1” was substituted for “Chapter 21.1 (§ 23-276.1 et seq.) of Title 23” to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

§ 25.1-105.
Condemnation of cemeteries.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to authorize the condemnation of property of any cemetery or burial ground, or any part thereof. The authority to condemn any cemetery or burial ground shall be specifically as provided by law.

History.

Code 1919, § 4384; Code 1950, §§ 25-45, 25-46; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.6; 2003, c. 940.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

An airport authority

is authorized to exercise its power of eminent domain to condemn trees in a private cemetery to provide unobstructed airspace for purposes of air safety. See opinion of Attorney General to Lucy E. Phillips, Esq., Washington County Attorney, 09-086, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 53 (12/11/09).

§ 25.1-106.
Condemnation of lands within agricultural and forestal districts.

No property that is within an agricultural and forestal district as provided by Chapter 43 (§

15.2-4300

et seq.) of Title 15.2 shall be condemned except in accordance with §§

15.2-4312

and

15.2-4313

.

History.

1977, c. 681, § 25-46.2:2; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to applicability of this section to Housing Authorities Law, see §

36-9.1

.

§ 25.1-107.
Condemnation of lands within adopted conservation or redevelopment plans.

After the adoption of a conservation or redevelopment plan pursuant to Article 7 (§

36-48

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 36, should any property located within the area of the conservation or redevelopment plan be downzoned without the expressed consent of the property owner and should the locality initiate condemnation proceedings against that owner after any such downzoning, the date of valuation shall be the date of adoption of the conservation or redevelopment plan. However, if the owner of the property on the date of the downzoning no longer owns the property on the date condemnation proceedings are initiated, then the date of valuation shall be the date of the filing of the petition for a condemnation or a certificate pursuant to Chapter 3 of this title, as the case may be.

If property located within a conservation or redevelopment plan adopted pursuant to Article 7 (§

36-48

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 36 was downzoned without the expressed consent of the property owner within a period of five years prior to the adoption of the conservation or redevelopment plan and if such downzoning was not part of a comprehensive rezoning of the locality, then, if the locality should initiate condemnation proceedings within five years after the adoption of the conservation or redevelopment plan against the same owner who owned the property at the time of the downzoning, the date of valuation shall be the day before the date the property was downzoned. However, if the owner of the property on the date condemnation proceedings are initiated is not the same owner on the date the property is downzoned, then the date of valuation shall be the date of the filing of a petition for condemnation or a certificate pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) of this title, as the case may be.

Where the date of valuation in condemnation proceedings governed by this section predates the date of any downzoning action, the locality may introduce into evidence before the body determining just compensation the estimated difference between the amount of real estate taxes that the owner would have paid had the downzoning not occurred and the amount of real estate taxes assessed against the property since the date of the downzoning and the body determining just compensation may offset the award by that amount.

History.

2004, c. 540.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of real estate and land use law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 42.

§ 25.1-108.
Offer to sell to former owner.

If a condemnor has acquired a fee simple interest in property by exercise of its power of eminent domain and subsequently declares that the property is surplus, the condemnor shall offer, within 30 days following such determination, to sell such property to the former owner or his heirs or other successors or assigns. If (i) the work or improvements described in any written statement required by law or in the petition for condemnation made pursuant to §

25.1-206

have not been let to contract or construction commenced within a period of 20 years from the date that the fee simple interest in the property vested in the condemnor, and the property is not being used for other public uses that are within the limitations set forth in §

1-219.1

or (ii) at any time the property is no longer used or needed for the public use for which the property was taken as may be described in any written statement required by law or in the petition for condemnation or for another specific public use that is within the limitations set forth in §

1-219.1

, the condemnor shall declare its fee simple interest in the property to be surplus and offer to sell the property to the former owner or his heirs or other successors or assigns. Additionally, if the conditions described in clause (i) or (ii) occur, the former property owner or his heirs or other successors or assigns may make a written demand that the condemnor (a) declare its fee simple interest in the property to be surplus and (b) offer to sell the property to the former owner or his heirs or other successors or assigns. Any contractual provision or agreement by the former owner waiving the right to receive an offer to sell from the condemnor is void and unenforceable. The offer to sell shall be made in writing by the condemnor at the price paid by the condemnor to the former owner plus interest at the annual rate of six percent, provided that the condemnor may increase the price by the fair market value of the condemnor’s improvements, determined at the time the offer to sell is made. In no case shall the price established by the condemnor exceed the fair market value of the property at the time the offer to sell is made. The offer to sell shall comply with the requirements of subsection B. If the former owner or his heirs or other successors or assigns do not accept in writing an offer to sell that complies with the requirements of this section within six months after the offer to sell has been made as provided in subsection B, the former owner or his heirs or other successors or assigns shall have no further right to purchase the property pursuant to this section. An offer to sell that satisfies the requirements of this subsection and subsection B shall be deemed a valid offer to sell under this section.

The condemnor shall (i) send the offer to sell to the former owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, to (a) the last known address of the former owner and (b) the address of the former owner as it appears in the tax records of the treasurer for the locality in which the property is located and (ii) publish the offer to sell in a newspaper having general circulation in the locality in which the property is located. The offer to sell shall be published once a week for two successive weeks, shall identify the former owner from whom the condemnor acquired the property, shall briefly describe the property and the date title vested in the condemnor, shall state the offer is made pursuant to this section, and shall state that the offer is open to any heirs, successors, or assigns of the former owner, who shall be named in the offer as parties unknown.

This section shall apply only to a fee simple interest in real property acquired by a condemnor in the exercise of its power of eminent domain. This section shall not apply to property acquired by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to Title 33.2. Further, this section shall not apply to property acquired by a locality for transportation projects, including for bond-funded transportation projects or for future transportation improvements, regardless of whether such projects are undertaken in conjunction with the Commonwealth Transportation Board, provided that as to any such acquisitions by a locality the provisions of §

33.2-1005

shall apply mutatis mutandis to the property and any disposition thereof. Also, this section shall not apply to property that is acquired by the owner of a railroad for actual operating purposes if the property is unsuitable for independent development.

History.

2005, c. 2; 2006, c. 246; 2007, cc. 882, 901, 926; 2011, cc. 117, 190.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 2, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only with respect to property acquired by a condemnor on or after July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, cc. 882, 901, and 926, cl. 3 provides: “That, until July 1, 2010, the provisions of this act shall not affect the ability of a redevelopment and housing authority organized pursuant to Title 36 of the Code of Virginia to acquire property pursuant to any redevelopment or conservation plan adopted prior to January 1, 2007. However, the provisions of this act shall be applicable to all redevelopment and conservation plans adopted after January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, cc. 882, 901, and 926, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2010, c. 203, provides: “Nothing contained in this act shall prohibit the Norfolk Redevelopment and Housing Authority or the City of Norfolk to acquire property located at Map Number 24488500 and Map Number 41138940, both located in the City of Norfolk, through the use of eminent domain for the location of a recreational facility open to the public to be owned or operated by a not-for-profit entity, provided such acquisitions are instituted prior to January 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’ to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

Acts 2011, cc. 117 and 190, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to the acquisition of real property by a railroad, public service corporation, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or two or more of the aforementioned, that is (i) the subject of a certificate recorded prior to July 1, 2011, in the clerk’s office where deeds are recorded; (ii) the subject of a petition for condemnation filed prior to July 1, 2011; or (iii) required to construct a project funded by bonds approved for issuance by a locality prior to July 1, 2011.”

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 246, in the first paragraph of subsection A, deleted “unless the former owner had waived his right to the offer of repurchase” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 882, 901 and 926 are identical, and, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, deleted “within 15 years of being vested with the title to such property” following “property is surplus” and inserted the second and third sentences and deleted the second paragraph, banning requirements for a condemnor to offer to sell property the condemnor has acquired through eminent domain to a former owner 15 years after vestment with the title to the property.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 117 and 190 are identical, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Real Estate Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2006).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 103.

§ 25.1-109.
Condemnation of lands for compensatory mitigation of wetlands.

When authorization is required by federal or state law for any project affecting wetlands and the authorization is conditioned upon compensatory mitigation for adverse impacts to wetlands, no condemnor shall acquire through exercise of the power of eminent domain any property to satisfy such condition unless: (i) the property sought to be acquired is located within the same locality as the project affecting wetlands, or (ii) the governing body of the locality where the property sought to be acquired consents to its acquisition for such purpose. This section shall not apply to property acquired by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to Title 33.2.

History.

2005, c. 311.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2005 act having been §

25.1-108

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 311, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any locality or political subdivision seeking to provide compensatory wetlands mitigation for impacts related to a project for which state or federal permits have been received prior to the effective date of this act.”

A reference in this section was updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’ to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 15.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Jurisdiction. —

Circuit court found that it did have subject matter jurisdiction over a case because the Virginia Department of Transportation was utilizing its eminent domain authority under §

25.1-109

, in tandem with Va. Const. art. 1, § 11 and §

33.2-1001

, to condemn property for the purpose of wetlands mitigation. Comm'r of Highway v. Lockhart, 106 Va. Cir. 31, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 156 (Buchanan County Aug. 17, 2020).